Utah statutes.
63B-13-201.   Revenue bond authorizations -- State Building Ownership Authority.

(1) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $8,205,000 for the acquisition and construction of five stores for the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the stores to be addressed through this authorization are:

(i)  a new Park City store;

(ii)  replacement of the Mount Olympus store;

(iii)  replacement of the Ogden City 2nd Street store;

(iv)  replacement of the Ogden Patterson Street store; and

(v)  expansion of the Provo store.

(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that proceeds from the sale of stores replaced through this authorization shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(d)  It is further the intent of the Legislature that increased sales revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (1).

(2) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $8,914,000 for the acquisition and construction of a new regional office building in Ogden, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  It is further the intent of the Legislature that existing rent budgets be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (2).

(3) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease-purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $1,450,000 for the acquisition of the leased regional office building and adjacent land in Moab, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  It is further the intent of the Legislature that existing rent budgets be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (3).

(4) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease-purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $7,103,000 for the acquisition of the Tooele Courts building and adjacent land in Tooele City, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  It is further the intent of the Legislature that court fees be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (4).



Enacted by Chapter 364, 2004 General Session

